Washington statutes.
RCW 19.260.040

Minimum efficiency standards.

Except as provided in subsection (1) of this section, the minimum efficiency standards specified in this section apply to the types of new products set forth in RCW 19.260.030 as of the effective dates set forth in RCW 19.260.050.

(1) The department may adopt by rule a more recent version of any standard or test method established in this section, including any product definition associated with the standard or test method, in order to maintain or improve consistency with other comparable standards in other states.

(2)(a) The standby energy consumption of bottle-type water dispensers, and point-of-use water dispensers, dispensing both hot and cold water, manufactured on or after January 1, 2010, shall not exceed 1.2 kWh/day.

(b) The test method for water dispensers shall be the environmental protection agency energy star program requirements for bottled water coolers version 1.1.

(3)(a) The standby energy consumption of hot water dispensers and mini-tank electric water heaters manufactured on or after January 1, 2010, shall be not greater than 35 watts.

(b) This subsection does not apply to any water heater:

(i) That is within the scope of 42 U.S.C. Sec. 6292(a)(4) or 6311(1);

(ii) That has a rated storage volume of less than 20 gallons; and

(iii) For which there is no federal test method applicable to that type of water heater.

(c) Hot water dispensers shall be tested in accordance with the method specified in the California Code of Regulations, Title 20, section 1604 in effect as of July 26, 2009.

(d) Mini-tank electric water heaters shall be tested in accordance with the method specified in the California Code of Regulations, Title 20, section 1604 in effect as of July 26, 2009.

(4) The following standards are established for portable electric spas:

(a) Beginning January 1, 2020, portable electric spas must meet the requirements of the American national standard for portable electric spa energy efficiency (ANSI/APSP/ICC-14 2014). Beginning January 1, 2024, portable electric spas must meet the requirements specified in the California Code of regulations, Title 20, section 1605.3 in effect as of January 1, 2022.

(b) Beginning January 1, 2020, portable electric spas must be tested in accordance with the method specified in the American national standard for portable electric spa energy efficiency (ANSI/APSP/ICC-14 2014). Beginning January 1, 2024, portable electric spas must be tested in accordance with the method specified in the California Code of regulations, Title 20, section 1605.3 in effect as of January 1, 2022.

(5) Commercial hot food holding cabinets must meet the qualification criteria of the energy star program requirements product specification for commercial hot food holding cabinets, version 2.0.

(6) Commercial dishwashers included in the scope of the environmental protection agency energy star program product specification for commercial dishwashers, version 2.0, must meet the qualification criteria of that specification.

(7) Commercial fryers included in the scope of the environmental protection agency energy star program product specification for commercial fryers, version 2.0, must meet the qualification criteria for that specification.

(8) Commercial steam cookers must meet the requirements of the environmental protection agency energy star program product specification for commercial steam cookers, version 1.2.

(9) Computers and computer monitors must meet the requirements in the California Code of Regulations, Title 20, section 1605.3(v) as adopted on May 10, 2017, and amended on November 8, 2017, as measured in accordance with test methods prescribed in section 1604(v) of those regulations.

(10) Air compressors that meet the twelve criteria listed on page 350 to 351 of the "energy conservation standards for air compressors" final rule issued by the United States department of energy on December 5, 2016, must meet the requirements in table 1 on page 352 following the instructions on page 353 and as measured in accordance with the "uniform test method for certain air compressors" under 10 C.F.R. Part 431 (Appendix A to Subpart T) as in effect on July 3, 2017.

(11) High CRI fluorescent lamps must meet the requirements in 10 C.F.R. Sec. 430.32(n)(4) in effect as of January 3, 2017, as measured in accordance with the test methods prescribed in 10 C.F.R. Sec. 430.23 (appendix R to subpart B of part 430) in effect as of January 3, 2017.

(12) Portable air conditioners must have a combined energy efficiency ratio, as measured in accordance with the test methods prescribed in 10 C.F.R. Sec. 430.23 (appendix CC to subpart B of part 430) in effect as of January 3, 2017, that is greater than or equal to:

1.04 ×

SACC

(3.7117 × SACC 0.6384)

where "SACC" is seasonally adjusted cooling capacity in Btu/h.

(13)(a) Residential ventilating fans must meet the qualification criteria of the environmental protection agency energy star program product specification for residential ventilating fans, version 3.2, consistent with the timeline specified in RCW 19.260.050(3).

(b) Residential ventilating fans must meet the qualification criteria of the environmental protection agency energy star program product specification for residential ventilating fans, version 4.1, consistent with the timeline specified in RCW 19.260.050(3).

(14) Spray sprinkler bodies that are not specifically excluded from the scope of the environmental protection agency water sense program product specification for spray sprinkler bodies, version 1.0, must include an integral pressure regulator and must meet the water efficiency and performance criteria and other requirements of that specification.

(15) The following products that are within the scope and definition of the applicable regulation must meet the requirements in the California Code of Regulations, Title 20, section 1605.3 in effect as of January 1, 2018, as measured in accordance with the test methods prescribed in the California Code of Regulations, Title 20, section 1604 in effect as of January 1, 2018:

(a) Showerheads;

(b) Tub spout diverters;

(c) Showerhead tub spout diverter combinations;

(d) Lavatory faucets and replacement aerators;

(e) Kitchen faucets and replacement aerators;

(f) Public lavatory faucets and replacement aerators;

(g) Urinals; and

(h) Water closets.

(16) Water coolers included in the scope of the environmental protection agency energy star program product specification for water coolers, version 2.0, must have an on mode with no water draw energy consumption less than or equal to the following values as measured in accordance with the test requirements of that program:

(a) 0.16 kilowatt-hours per day for cold-only units and cook and cold units;

(b) 0.87 kilowatt-hours per day for storage type hot and cold units; and

(c) 0.18 kilowatt-hours per day for on demand hot and cold units.

(17) General service lamps must meet or exceed a lamp efficacy of 45 lumens per watt, when tested in accordance with the applicable federal test procedures for general service lamps prescribed in 10 C.F.R. Sec. 430.23 in effect as of January 3, 2017.

(18) Air purifiers other than industrial air purifiers must meet the qualification criteria of the environmental protection agency energy star program product specification for room air cleaners, version 2.0.

(19) Commercial ovens included in the scope of the energy star program requirements product specification for commercial ovens, version 2.2, must meet the qualification criteria of that specification.

(20) Electric vehicle supply equipment included in the scope of the energy star program requirements product specification for electric vehicle supply equipment, version 1.0, other than charging cords with NEMA 5-15P or NEMA 5-20P attachment plugs, must meet the qualification criteria of that specification.

[ 2022 c 19 s 4; 2019 c 286 s 4; 2009 c 501 s 3; 2006 c 194 s 3; 2005 c 298 s 4.]